tests/miscphon.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../kaz.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kaz.automorf.hfst


Tests:
  "Russian words ending in ь":
    автомобиль<n><nom> : автомобиль
    автомобиль<n><pl><nom> : автомобильдер
    автомобиль<n><gen> : автомобильдің
    автомобиль<n><px3sp><acc> : автомобилін
    руль<n><nom> : руль
    руль<n><pl><nom> : рульдер
    руль<n><gen> : рульдің
    руль<n><px3sp><acc> : рулін

  "Russian words ending in сс":
    процесс<n><nom> : процесс
    процесс<n><pl><nom> : процестер
    процесс<n><gen> : процестің
    процесс<n><px3sp><nom> : процесі

  "Russian words ending in ст":
    журналист<n><nom> : журналист
    журналист<n><pl><nom> : журналистер
    журналист<n><gen> : журналистің
    журналист<n><dat> : журналистке
    журналист<n><px3sp><nom> : журналисті

  "Russian words ending in зд":
    съезд<n><nom> : съезд
    съезд<n><pl><nom> : съездер
    съезд<n><gen> : съездің
    съезд<n><dat> : съезге
    съезд<n><px3sp><nom> : съезді

  "Some Russian words affected by the original versions of these rules":
    бассейн<n><px3sp><nom> : бассейні
    бассейн<n><gen> : бассейннің
    премьер-министр<n><px3sp><nom> : премьер-министрі
    премьер-министр<n><gen> : премьер-министрдің

  "Russian words ending in к":
    банк<n><nom> : банк
    банк<n><dat> : банкке
    банк<n><px3sp><nom> : банкі
    банк<n><abl> : банктен

  "Russian words with к as last cons, but ending in back vow":
    отставка<n><nom> : отставка
    отставка<n><dat> : отставкаға
    отставка<n><gen> : отставканың
